src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-1A-cuaelkkad_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - cuälkkad: # Verb 'rattle/kolista' - full paradigm
     cuälkkad+V+Inf: cuälkkad
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuälkam
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: cuälkak
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuälkk
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: cuälkkap
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: cuälkkveʹted
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cuälkka
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: cuälkat
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: cuälk
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cuålkkum
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cuålkkuk
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cuälkai
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: cuälkaim
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: cuälkaid
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cuålkku
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: cuålkkuš
     cuälkkad+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: cuälkkam
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+Sg1: cuälkžem
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+Sg2: cuälkžiǩ
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+Sg3: cuälkaž
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+Pl1: cuälkžep
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+Pl2: cuälkžid 
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+Pl3: cuälkže
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+Sg4: cuälkžet
     cuälkkad+V+Pot+ConNeg: cuälkže
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+Sg1: cuälkčem
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+Sg2: cuälkčiǩ
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+Sg3: cuälkči
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+Pl1: cuälkčim
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+Pl2: cuälkčid
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+Pl3: cuälkče
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+Sg4: cuälkčeš
     cuälkkad+V+Cond+ConNeg: cuälkče
     cuälkkad+V+Imprt+Sg2: cuälk
     cuälkkad+V+Imprt+Sg3: cuälkas
     cuälkkad+V+Imprt+Pl1: cuälkkap
     cuälkkad+V+Imprt+Pl2: cuälkkad
     cuälkkad+V+Imprt+Pl3: cuälkkaz
     cuälkkad+V+Imprt+ConNeg: cuälk
     cuälkkad+V+Imprt+ConNegII: cuålkku
     cuälkkad+V+Actio+Ess: cuälkkmen
     cuälkkad+V+Actio: cuälkkam
     cuälkkad+V+Act+PrsPrc: cuälkkai
     cuälkkad+V+Act+PrfPrc: cuälkkam
     cuälkkad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: cuålkkum
     cuälkkad+V+VAbess: cuälkǩâni
     cuälkkad+V+Ger+Ess: cuälkeen
     cuälkkad+V+Ger+Instr: cuälkeeʹl
     cuälkkad+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: cuäˈlkškuẹʹtted
